California, session 20252026, SB890.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10000. The purpose of this division is to provide for protection, care, and assistance to the people of the state in need thereof, of them, and to promote the welfare and happiness of all of the people of the state by providing appropriate aid and services to all of its the people of the state who are needy and distressed. It is the legislative intent intent of the Legislature that aid shall be administered and services provided promptly and humanely, with due regard for the preservation of family life, and without discrimination on account of ancestry, marital status, political affiliation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code. That aid shall be so administered and services so provided, administered, and services provided, in that manner to the extent not in conflict with federal law, as in order to encourage self-respect, self-reliance, and the desire to be a good citizen, useful to society.